Louisiana, session 2026, HB1102.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 32:791(K) is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§791. Application for license; renewal; fees; educational seminar; bond
requirements; liability insurance; salesperson's license; location of business
* * *
K. A sale shall still be deemed to occur at the facility licensed by the
commission and it shall not be a violation of any provision of this Title for a used
motor vehicle dealer to do any of the following:
(1) Deliver a used motor vehicle to a customer for a test drive away from the
used motor vehicle dealer’s registered place of business.
(2) Deliver documents for signature of the parties away from the used motor
vehicle dealer’s registered place of business.
(3) Deliver documents to, or obtain documents from, a customer away from
the used motor vehicle dealer's registered place of business.
(4) Deliver a used motor vehicle to a customer away from the used motor
vehicle dealer’s registered place of business.
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-2446 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1102